Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3039
Controllable electronic record kiosk transactions; limitations.

A controllable electronic record kiosk operator shall not accept transactions in a day in connection with controllable electronic record kiosk transactions for a single customer in this state via one or more controllable electronic record kiosks exceeding:

(1) For new customers, two thousand United States dollars or the equivalent in controllable electronic records; or

(2) For existing customers, ten thousand five hundred dollars or the equivalent in controllable electronic records.

Laws 2025, LB609, § 8.